Washington statutes.
RCW 1.80.180

Consistency and interoperability.

The governmental agency of this state which adopts standards pursuant to RCW 1.80.170 may encourage and promote consistency and interoperability with similar requirements adopted by other governmental agencies of this and other states and the federal government and nongovernmental persons interacting with governmental agencies of this state. If appropriate, those standards may specify differing levels of standards from which governmental agencies of this state may choose in implementing the most appropriate standard for a particular application.

[ 2020 c 57 s 19.]